Arkansas, session 2025, HB1417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 1, Chapter 4, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
1-4-141. State duck.
(a) The mallard duck is designated the official duck of the State of
Arkansas.
(b)(1) This section does not require a state agency or office to
republish a publication or brochure in order to list or display the state
duck.
(2) A state agency or office may include the information
concerning the state duck in future publications or brochures or in a
scheduled update to a publication or brochure.
(c) This section does not grant a protected status to the mallard
duck.





*MBM130*
02/05/2025 1:35:42 PM MBM130